District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

3-1209.04

Addiction counselor.

Repealed.

Mar. 25, 1986, D.C. Law 6-99, § 904
as added July 22, 1992, D.C. Law 9-126, § 2(h), 39 DCR 3824
July 7, 2009, D.C. Law 18-13, § 2(f), 56 DCR 3608
1981 Ed., § 2-3309.4.